New Jersey, session 221, A4572.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Constitutionally dedicated corporation business tax revenues means corporation business tax revenues dedicated pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund for the acquisition or development of lands by local government units for recreation and conservation purposes in accordance with the provisions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). Densely or highly populated municipality means a municipality with a population density of at least 5,000 persons per square mile, or a population of at least 35,000 persons, according to the latest federal decennial census. Densely populated county means a county with a population density of at least 5,000 persons per square mile according to the latest federal decennial census. Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund means the fund established pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-19). Green Acres bond act means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, P.L.1989, c.183, P.L.1987, c.265, and P.L.1983, c.354. Highly populated county means a county with a population density of at least 1,000 persons per square mile according to the latest federal decennial census. Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund means the fund established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48). Stewardship activity means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-45). 2.    There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the following sums for the purpose of providing grants or loans, or both, to assist local government units to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes pursuant to section 4 of this act and for the purpose of providing grants or loans, or both, to assist local government units to develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes pursuant to section 5 of this act: a.     $50,090,000 from constitutionally dedicated corporation business tax revenues.  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection, the sum of $4,292,000 is available due to interest earnings on the constitutionally dedicated corporation business tax revenues; b.    $24,500,000 from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund and any Green Acres fund established pursuant to a Green Acres bond act, made available due to loan repayments and interest earnings; and c. $24,696,535 from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund and any Green Acres fund established pursuant to a Green Acres bond act, made available due to project cancellations and withdrawals. 3.    a.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund the sum of  $52,500,000 to implement the provisions of this act. b.  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the sum of $2,410,000 is appropriated from the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purposes of paying administrative costs associated with administering the applicable provisions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 4.    a.  The following planning incentive acquisition projects to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Oakland Boro Bergen Boro of Oakland Open Space & Recreation Plan $700,000 Burlington County Burlington Planning Incentive 1,400,000 Evesham Twp Burlington Planning Incentive 113,150 Medford Twp Burlington Open Space Incentive 550,000 Cherry Hill Twp Camden Planning Incentive Grant 1,050,000 Livingston Twp Essex Open Space Acquisition 700,000 Verona Twp Essex Verona Open Space Acquisition 700,000 West Orange Twp Essex Open Space Acquisition 1,050,000 Gloucester County Gloucester Open Space Plan 1,400,000 Readington Twp Hunterdon Greenway Incentive Plan 300,000 Union Twp Hunterdon Union Twp Open Space Plan 650,000 East Windsor Twp Mercer East Windsor Open Space Acquisition 330,000 Hamilton Twp Mercer Hamilton Township Open Space Acquisition 1,050,000 Princeton Boro Mercer Princeton Open Space Acquisition 700,000 Robbinsville Twp Mercer Green Links Program 473,285 West Windsor Twp Mercer West Windsor Planning Incentive 700,000 Monmouth County Monmouth Planning Incentive Acquisition 1,750,000 Howell Twp Monmouth Planning Incentive 2 1,050,000 Hanover Twp Morris Open Space Acquisition 700,000 Madison Boro Morris Madison Boro Open Space Acquisition 700,000 Brick Twp Ocean Open Space & Recreation Plan 1,400,000 Montgomery Twp Somerset Open Space Acquisition 5 700,000 Union County Union Open Space & Recreation Plan 2,100,000 Knowlton Twp Warren Open Space Acquisition 500,000 TOTAL $20,766,435 b.    The following standard acquisition projects to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Wood-Ridge Boro Monmouth Beach Boro Bergen Monmouth Wood-Ridge Recreation Complex Acquisition Robbins Street Project $1,050,000 $387,500 TOTAL $1,437,500 c.     The following site-specific incentive acquisition projects to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Park Ridge Boro Bergen North 5th Street Acquisition $459,950 TOTAL $459,950 d.    The following urban aid acquisition projects to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Neptune Township Phillipsburg Town Monmouth Warren Division Street Park Acquisition Rails to Trails Acquisition $258,000 $1,400,000 TOTAL $1,658,000 GRAND TOTAL $24,321,885 5.    a.  The following projects to develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, located in municipalities eligible to receive State aid pursuant to P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.) either as of June 30, 2021 or the effective date of this act, or sponsored by densely populated counties, are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Atlantic City Atlantic Gardners Basin Improvements $1,400,000 Garfield City Bergen Columbus Park Improvements 1,400,000 Mount Holly Twp Burlington Iron Works Park Improvements 1,400,000 Willingboro Twp Burlington Millcreek Park Pickleball Courts 70,000 Camden County Camden Cooper River Park Playground Improvements 1,750,000 Gloucester Twp Camden Taylor Avenue Playground Redevelopment 948,630 Vineland City Cumberland Romano Complex Improvements 1,400,000 Essex County Essex Watsessing Park Playground 1,605,310 Belleville Twp Essex Municipal Stadium Grandstand Improvements 1,400,000 Newark City Essex Broadway Park 1,400,000 Orange City Twp Essex Colgate Park Improvements Phase II 380,830 Hudson County Hudson JJ Braddock Park Picnic Area Improvements 1,746,000 Bayonne City Hudson Newark Bay Waterfront Phase II 1,400,000 Hoboken City Hudson Southwest Park Development 1,400,000 Kearny Town Hudson Norman A. Doyle Pavilion Playground 528,380 Trenton City Mercer Amtico Square Skatepark Complex 1,400,000 Carteret Boro Middlesex Arthur Kill River Walk North 1,400,000 New Brunswick City Middlesex Alec E. Baker Park Renovation 1,400,000 Perth Amboy City Middlesex Veteran Memorial Park Improvements 1,400,000 Clifton City Passaic Main Memorial Park Improvements 1,400,000 Passaic City Passaic Colonel Johnson Park Revitalization 1,400,000 Paterson City Passaic Vista Park Development Project 1,400,000 Plainfield City Union Rushmore Ave. Rec. Complex  Phase II 1,400,000 TOTAL $29,429,150 b.    The following projects to develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, located in densely or highly populated municipalities or sponsored by highly populated counties, are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Bergen County Bergen Carlton Hill Bergen County Greenway Park $1,750,000 Fort Lee Boro Bergen Inwood Terrace Park Pool Improvements 375,000 Teaneck Twp Bergen Sagamore Park Improvement Project 750,000 South Orange Village Twp Essex Cameron Recreation Area Renovation 1,025,000 Monroe Township Middlesex Monroe Community Gardens 469,000 Sayerville Boro Middlesex Kennedy Park Trail Improvements 325,000 Red Bank Boro Monmouth Count Basie Bleacher Replacement 577,875 Passaic County Passaic Peckman Preserve Improvements 482,500 Haledon Boro Passaic Roe Street Park Improvements 497,145 Prospect Park Boro Passaic Hofstra Park Courts Project 255,250 Union Twp Union Weber Park Renovation 1,050,000 TOTAL $7,556,770 c.     The following standard park development projects are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Burlington Twp Burlington Tennis Court Rehabilitation at Green Acres I $700,000 Hainesport Twp Burlington Creek Turn Park 700,000 Greenwich Twp Gloucester Memorial Park Improvements 700,000 Hightstown Boro Mercer Dawes Park Recreational and ADA Improvements 127,700 Little Falls Twp Passaic Amity Park Playground 145,000 Carneys Point Twp Salem Recreational Complex Infrastructure Improvements 700,000 TOTAL $3,072,700 d.    The following projects for stewardship activities are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Oradell Boro Bergen Memorial Field Trail Stewardship Project $71,115 Evesham Twp Burlington Passive Park Improvements 125,360 Union County Union Homestead Farmhouse at Oak Ridge Park 239,900 Union Township Union Joe Collins Park Renovation 57,000 Rocky Hill Boro Somerset Van Horne Park Raised Walkway 240,235 Passaic County Passaic Lambert Castle Landscape Restoration 1,025,000 TOTAL $1,758,610 e.     The following projects for completely inclusive playgrounds, pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2018, c.104 (C.13:8C-27.1), are eligible for funding with the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act: LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT COUNTY PROJECT APPROVED AMOUNT Bergen County Bergen Saddle River County Park Inclusive Playground $1,000,000 Dumont Boro Bergen Charlie OConnor Park Improvements 489,570 Englewood City Bergen Mackay Park Playground Improvements Project 540,920 Fort Lee Boro Bergen Coytesville Park Playground Improvements Project 562,500 Ridgefield Park Village Bergen Fellowship Park Playground Improvements 487,500 Burlington City Burlington JFK Park Improvements 750,000 Evesham Twp Burlington Evesboro Downs Park Inclusive Playground 731,845 Willingboro Twp Burlington Millcreek Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Pennsauken Twp Camden Welcome Home Jakes Place 702,750 Cedar Grove Twp Essex Lower Playground Reconstruction 750,000 Maplewood Twp Essex Maplecrest Completely Inclusive Playground 750,000 Millburn Twp Essex Taylor Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Montclair Twp Essex Nishuane Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Verona Twp Essex Everett Field Inclusive Playground 750,000 Monroe Twp Gloucester Inclusive Playground at Peiffer Community Center 750,000 Washington Twp Gloucester Washington Lake Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Hudson County Hudson Washington Park Inclusive Playground 1,000,000 Hoboken City Hudson Church Square Park Playground Upgrades 750,000 Secaucus Town Hudson Ivanoski Park Improvements 750,000 Hunterdon County Hunterdon South County Park Inclusive Playground 1,000,000 Clinton Town Hunterdon Halstead Street Inclusive Playground 562,500 Clinton Twp Hunterdon Runkle Drive Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 East Brunswick Twp Middlesex Inclusive Playground at Lenape Park 750,000 Monroe Twp Middlesex Inclusive Playground at Monroe Community Gardens 750,000 Old Bridge Twp Middlesex Geick Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 South River Boro Middlesex Grekoski Park Inclusive Playground 554,250 Belmar Boro Monmouth Maclearie Park Inclusive Playground 525,750 Eatontown Boro Monmouth Wolcott Park Jakes Law Playground 660,000 Freehold Boro Monmouth Lenoir Park Inclusive Playground 508,600 Holmdel Twp Monmouth Cross Farm Park All-Inclusive Playground 700,000 Howell Twp Monmouth Echo Lake Park Improvements 562,500 Little Silver Twp Monmouth Sickles Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Oceanport Boro Monmouth Blackberry Bay Park All-Inclusive 337,500 West Long Branch Boro Monmouth Sorrentino Park Playground Improvements 350,250 Madison Boro Morris Dodge Field Playground 517,500 Seaside Heights Boro Ocean Beach Playground 750,000 Bloomindale Boro Passaic Bogue Pond Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 Little Falls Twp Passaic Duva Field Playground Updates 726,000 Wayne Twp Passaic Inclusive Playground at the Wayne Museum 330,000 Woodland Park Boro Passaic Dian Grimes Memorial Park Inclusivity Upgrade 750,000 Montgomery Twp Somerset Montgomery All-Inclusive Playground 750,000 Byram Twp Sussex CO Johnson Park Inclusive Playground 464,120 Sparta Twp Sussex Station Park Inclusive Playground 517,165 Union County Union Playground at Warinanco Park 915,000 New Providence Boro Union Oakwood Park Playground 750,000 Plainfield City Union Rushmore Park Inclusive Playground 665,200 Summit City Union Mabie Playground Improvements 750,000 Union Twp Union Irene Hoppe Park Renovation 486,000 Phillipsburg Town Warren Brainard Street Park Inclusive Playground 750,000 TOTAL $33,147,420 GRAND TOTAL $74,964,650 6.    a.  Any transfer of funds, or change in project sponsor, site, or type, listed in section 4 or 5 of this act shall require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. b.    To the extent that moneys remain available after the projects listed in section 4 or 5 of this act are offered funding pursuant thereto, any project of a local government unit that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund for recreation and conservation purposes, or that receives funding approved pursuant to this act, shall be eligible to receive additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. 7.    a. There is reappropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the unexpended balances, due to project withdrawals, cancellations, or cost savings, of the amounts appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund to assist local government units to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, for the purposes of providing: (1)   grants or loans, or both, to assist local government units to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, for projects approved as eligible for such funding pursuant to this act; and (2)   additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, to any project of a local government unit that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund for recreation and conservation purposes or that receives funding approved pursuant to this act, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor.  Any such additional funding provided from a Green Acres bond act may include administrative costs. b.    There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection such sums as may be, or may become, available on or before June 30, 2024, due to interest earnings or loan repayments in any "Green Trust Fund" established pursuant to a Green Acres bond act or in the "Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund," for the purpose of providing: (1)   grants or loans, or both, to assist local government units to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, for projects approved as eligible for such funding pursuant to this act; and (2)   additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, to any project of a local government unit that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund for recreation and conservation purposes or that receives funding approved pursuant to this act, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. Any such additional funding provided from a Green Acres bond act may include administrative costs. 8.    This act shall take effect immediately.